Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.442

Warranty service—Timely compensation for work performed.

A manufacturer of manufactured homes who designates a representative within this state to provide consumers with warranty service for manufactured homes on behalf of the manufacturer shall make reasonable and timely compensation to the representative for performance of the warranty service.

[ 2001 c 335 s 7; 1980 c 153 s 2.]

NOTES:

Application—2001 c 335: See note following RCW 43.22.335.